Mississippi, session 2026, HB1173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As a condition of being employed by the State of Mississippi, the State Personnel Board shall require each person who is seeking employment by the State of Mississippi to submit to and pass a drug test. (2)  The State Personnel Board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the drug testing of prospective state employees. (3)  The cost of a drug test required under this section must be paid by the person who is being tested; however, the State Personnel Board, in its discretion, may elect to pay for the cost of the drug test on behalf of any prospective state employee. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.